










 




Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 12:42 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP is a privately owned hedge fund sponsor. The firm also acts as a commodity trading advisor and commodity pool operator. It primarily provides its services to non-profit organizations. The firm manages client specific hedge fund portfolios. It also manages an equity fund for its clients. The firm invests in alternative investment markets. It’s primary investments comprise of hedge funds and future contracts. The firm combines equity long/short, arbitrage, and trading strategies for its investments. It employs a combination of qualitative and quantitative analysis to make its investments. The firm was founded in October 2002 and is based in Princeton,...
Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP is a privately owned hedge fund sponsor. The firm also acts as a commodity trading advisor and commodity pool operator. It primarily provides its services to non-profit organizations. The firm manages client specific hedge fund portfolios. It also manages an equity fund for its clients. The firm invests in alternative investment markets. It’s primary investments comprise of hedge funds and future contracts. The firm combines equity long/short, arbitrage, and trading strategies for its investments. It employs a combination of qualitative and quantitative analysis to make its investments. The firm was founded in October 2002 and is based in Princeton, New Jersey. Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP operates as a subsidiary of Equinox Financial Group, LLC.
Detailed Description


47 Hulfish StreetSuite 510Princeton, NJ 08542United StatesFounded in 2002



Phone: 609-430-0404

Fax: 609-454-5010

www.tapestryam.com







Key Executives for Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP




Mr. Afroz Qadeer


      	Founding Partner, President, Co-Chief Investment Officer, and Portfolio Manager
      








Ms. Karen Marie Judge


      	Partner and Chief Compliance Officer
      








Dr. Ajay Raghunath Dravid Ph.D.


      	Chief Investment Officer and Portfolio Manager
      








Dr. Rufus Rankin


      	Director of Research and Portfolio Manager
      








Mr. James Anderson


      	Senior Analyst
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP, please visit www.tapestryam.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback





























equinox institutional asset management lp
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Management
Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP operates as an investment firm. The Company offers portfolio management, financial planning, and investment advisory services. Equinox Institutional Asset Management serves customers in the States of New Jersey and Colorado.




Corporate Information
Address:

47 Hulfish Street
Suite 510
Princeton, NJ 08542
United States


Phone:
1-609-430-0404


Fax:
1-609-454-5010


Web url:
www.equinoxfunds.com























From The Web











Key Executives


Robert Joseph Enck "Bob"


President/CEO




Laura Marie Latella


Chief Administrative Officer




Ajay Raghunath Dravid


Chief Investment Officer




Stacey Jean Gillespie


Chief Compliance Officer




Rufus Grady Rankin


Director:Research




Kristina Magolis


Legal Counsel







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data





































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP | Wealthminder











































Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP


Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP
(CRD# 137894) is a financial advisory firm headquartered in
Princeton, NJ.
They
manage $1,876,402,000 in 9 accounts and
serve the financial needs of clients across 0 states (or territories).




Current Firm Details



Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP




47 Hulfish Street, Suite 510,
Princeton,
NJ
08542
609-430-0404
http://www.equinoxfunds.com




http://www.equinoxfunds.com







By the Numbers






Total Assets Under Management

1,876
MILLION



Total Number of Accounts

9
ACCOUNTS



Average Account Value

$208,489,111







Compensation Options




A percentage of assets under your management






Advisory Services Offered




Portfolio management for investment companies (as well as "business development companies")
Other








Types of Clients










Registered States






Registered Investment Advisor


Advisors affiliated with a RIA are permitted to work with up to five clients in nearly-all states* without explicit registration. The map below shows states where this firm has explicit registration only.











Financial Advisors at Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP








No Advisor Found.








Our primary data source is public filings of Form ADV as published by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and made available in accordance with the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA). Supplementary information may be provided by listed advisors or their representatives.
Because many firms provide a variety of products or services, an individual may or may not be registered to operate under all services provided by the firm.Do not rely solely on the information on this page. The information may be inaccurate, incomplete or outdated. For the most accurate and up-to-date information, please search for the firm or individual on the SEC site at
http://www.adviserinfo.sec.gov/IAPD/Content/Search/iapd_Search.aspx







Ready to hire a financial advisor?

Get competitive proposals from multiple advisors.

















Request Proposals























Timeout!



You have been idle and will be logged out in

seconds.


Stay Logged In
Log Out Now



















Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP - Relationship Science



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP



Overview
In The News Executives & Employees Paths



Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP



 OVERVIEW



Date Founded


2003




Headquarters


47 Hulfish Street, Suite 510, Princeton, NJ 08542-3713




Employees (Worldwide)


12




Industries


Investment Services & Portfolio Management




Company Description


Equinox Institutional Asset Management specializes in the construction, implementation and monitoring of multi-manager hedge fund portfolios and managed futures strategies. The firm provides discretionary and non-discretionary investment advisory services to institutions and other qualified investment groups. They provide advice on the allocation of assets to third-party investment managers that use a broad range of investment strategies in the alternative investment space including Equity Long/Short, Arbitrage and Trading. The Equinox Alternative Strategy Platform is a platform of single Commodity Trading Advisor (CTA) program alternative investment mutual funds. The platform presents liquid and transparent alternative investment strategies, and a broader application of Equinox’s capabilities to serve some investors.Equinox serves as the investment advisor for Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund, a 1940 Act Fund, offered through Northern Lights Fund Trust, a mutual fund family that offers separate investment portfolios. The fund seeks to achieve capital appreciation in both bull and bear equity markets with an annual volatility that is generally lower than the volatility experienced by the S&P 500 Index. The fund invests in a combination of derivatives and fixed income securities. Equinox also serves as the investment advisor for Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund, a 1940 Act Fund that seeks to provide exposure to broad-based US equity indices while employing a hedging strategy to potentially enhance returns and dampen risk during periods of equity market stress.




Website


http://www.equinoxfunds.com






 In The News
          See more




Hedgeweek
October 30, 2014





                        Equinox Funds makes portfolio manager promotions                    





Infovest21
October 29, 2014





                        Movers and Shakers                    





US Fed News
August 30, 2013





                        SEC ISSUES NOTICE ABOUT EQUINOX FUNDS TRUST AND EQUINOX INSTITUTIONAL ASSET MANAGEMENT APPLICATION                    





Hedgeweek
April 4, 2013





                        Equinox expands portfolio management team                    






 Executives & Employees



Robert Joseph Enck

President & Chief Executive Officer




Vance Jeffery Sanders

Chief Financial Officer





Ajay Raghunath Dravid

Chief Investment Officer




Philip Liu

General Counsel





Stacey J. Gillespie

Chief Compliance Officer




Laura Marie Latella

Chief Administrative Officer





Rufus Grady Rankin, IV

Director of Research




Richard Eugene Bornhoft

Managing Director of Portfolio Management





Kristina Magolis

Legal Counsel






See our list of current and previous employees when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP



                        Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤





















        IAPD - Investment Adviser Search

































                    An official website of the United States Government
                    




















Individual


Firm









                        at
                    










5 Miles
15 Miles
25 Miles











Search












Below is a list of all possible matches that were returned based on the search criteria you provided.   Search results may include both investment advisers and broker-dealers.  Results show whether each firm is an investment adviser, broker-dealer or both. 
Clicking the Get Details button will provide you with a summary for the individual or firm.
For additional information, please see the information below the list of possible matches. 


1 Result






EQUINOX INSTITUTIONAL ASSET MANAGEMENT, LP(CRD# 137894 / SEC# 801-64917)
Alternate Names:
                    EQUINOX FUNDS , TAPESTRY ASSET MANAGEMENT L.P. , TAPESTRY ASSET MANAGEMENT LP





                                47 HULFISH STREET, SUITE 510, PRINCETON, NJ 08542






                    Investment Adviser Firm
                












The investment advisers listed above are (or were in the last 10 years) registered with the SEC and/or the states, or exempt from registration but required to file reports with the SEC and/or the states.
The broker-dealers listed above have information in FINRA’s BrokerCheck system.
By clicking on any investment adviser above, you will be viewing the most recent Form ADV it filed. Investment advisers file a Form ADV to register with the SEC and/or the states. Exempt Reporting Advisers complete a portion of Form ADV for purposes of reporting to the SEC and/or the states.
By clicking on any broker-dealer above, you will be linked to FINRA's BrokerCheck system to view information about that broker-dealer.
If you would like additional information about an investment adviser (such as the investment adviser's previously filed Form ADVs), contact the SEC Public Reference Room (202-551-8090) or contact a state where the investment adviser is registered or files reports.
If the individual or firm you are searching for is not listed above, click here for suggestions.
Please click here to return to the beginning of the search results.  
























 






Log in | Equinox Funds























































Home
Our Firm
Contact



  







StrategiesSingle-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund
Equinox BH-DG Strategy Fund
Equinox Campbell Strategy Fund
Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
Equinox Crabel Strategy Fund
Equinox IPM Systematic Macro Fund
Equinox Systematica Macro Fund

Multi-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund
Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund

Commodity PoolsMulti-StrategyEquinox Frontier Diversified Fund
Equinox Frontier Long/Short Commodity Fund
Equinox Frontier Masters Fund

Multi-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Balanced Fund
Equinox Frontier Heritage Fund
Equinox Frontier Select Fund

Single-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Winton Fund



Performance
Thought LeadershipFeaturedPress Play SeriesManaged Futures and CTAs: A SmorgasbordManaged Futures During Equity "Crises"—An UpdateWhy Managed Futures?The Press Play Series is an Advisor resource to assist when explaining investment related topics to clients.
It is important to understand that not all futures-trading strategies fall under the managed futures umbrella as conventionally defined.
The historical performance of equities and managed futures during times of crisis, including the most recent example, December 2015 – January 2016.
Created as a tool for Advisors, this client friendly presentation provides a succinct overview of the asset class and examines the impact managed futures can have throughout several market environments.

Fund Literature & Forms
News, Media & Events



  







You are hereEquinox Funds/ User account/ Log in 

 






Corporate Login


Username *

Enter your Equinox Funds username.


Password *

Enter the password that accompanies your username.



 Register | Forgot Password?








Customer service
877.837.0600 (toll free)
          303.837.0600
          Fax 303.832.9354









PAST PERFORMANCE IS NOT NECESSARILY INDICATIVE OF FUTURE RESULTS. THERE IS RISK OF LOSS. YOU CAN LOSE MONEY IN A MANAGED FUTURES PROGRAM.
Investors should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the Funds. This and other important information about the Funds are in the relevant Prospectuses which can be obtained by calling 1-888-643-3431. The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.
Administration: For the Frontier Fund, BNP Paribas Financial Services, LCC manages NAV administration and Phoenix American Financial Services, Inc. manages Transfer Agency Administration.  Neither BNP Paribas Financial Services, LLC nor Phoenix American Financial Services, Inc. are affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC. For the MutualHedge Frontier Legends Fund and the Equinox Alternative Strategy Platform, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages all accounting, administration, and compliance matters for the Trust. Gemini Fund Services, LLC is not affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC.The mutual funds are distributed by Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA.


 

 

 






Equinox Funds Announces Portfolio Manager Promotions 









































































English
Français











Register
Sign In













Equinox Funds Announces Portfolio Manager Promotions




















October 29, 2014 11:44 ET

 | Source: Equinox Funds





PRINCETON, N.J., Oct. 29, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Equinox Financial Group, LLC ("Equinox"), a leading provider of alternative investments, is pleased to announce two promotions within the organization's portfolio management team. Effective November 1, 2014, Dr. Ajay Dravid will become the Chief Investment Officer of Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP, and Dr. Rufus Rankin will assume the role of Director of Research of Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP.

	"These promotions will strengthen the leadership within Equinox Funds' portfolio management and research team and underscore the firm's commitment to 'Building Better Alternatives,''' stated Robert J. Enck, President and Chief Executive Officer of Equinox. "Both Dr. Dravid and Dr. Rankin have been instrumental in the conception, development and implementation of new products and portfolio management strategies at Equinox Funds," continued Mr. Enck.

	Dr. Ajay Dravid is a veteran in the alternative investment industry. He joined Equinox Fund Management, LLC as a portfolio manager in January 2011 with more than 25 years of experience in industry, academia, and financial services. Prior to joining Equinox Fund Management Dr. Dravid was the President of Saranac Capital Management – a separate entity spun out from Citigroup – managing more than $3 billion in hedge fund assets. In his expanded role, Dr. Dravid will oversee all portfolio management activities at Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP.

	Dr. Rankin has been a part of Equinox Funds' portfolio management team since January 2011. Prior to that, he served as a Product Development Manager at Equinox Financial Solutions, an affiliate of Equinox. Over the last few years, Dr. Rankin has also been engaged in the development and implementation of new product initiatives at Equinox Funds. In his expanded role, Dr. Rankin will continue to work alongside Dr. Dravid, managing all Equinox Funds' offerings.

	Richard Bornhoft, Chief Investment Officer at Equinox Fund Management, LLC, continues to serve on the portfolio management team for all Equinox Funds' managed futures multi-strategy offerings.

	Equinox Funds has been an innovator in alternative investment product development and distribution since its founding in 2003. In December 2009, Equinox Funds launched the Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund ("MutualHedge") (ticker: MHFAX), the first actively managed mutual fund with exposure to Commodity Trading Advisor programs. Equinox Funds also sponsors the Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund, the Equinox Alternative Strategy Platform, a menu of single commodity trading advisor programs offered in a mutual fund format, and Equinox Frontier Funds, a public managed futures family of funds with daily liquidity.

	Investors should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses of the Funds. These and other important information about the Funds are contained in the applicable Prospectus, which can be obtained by calling 1-888-643-3431. The Prospectus should be read carefully before investing.

	Securities offered through Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA. 47 Hulfish Street, Suite 510, Princeton, NJ 08542 1-877-837-0600

	Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund, Equinox EquityHedge Strategy Fund, and Equinox Alternative Strategy Platform are distributed by Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA.   

	Equinox Financial Group, LLC, Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC and Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP, are not affiliated with Northern Lights Distributors, LLC.
Media Contact:
Eva Mansson-Blair
Tel: 303-991-6770



Related Articles
other press releases by Equinox Funds


Shareholders Approve Major Structural Change to Top Performing Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
July 26, 2017 10:08


Equinox Funds’ Press Play Series Fills a Void as it Eclipses 100,000 Views
July 21, 2017 11:05


Equinox Funds Aligns Focus Toward Mutual Fund Business – Announces Agreement of Sale of the Equinox Frontier Funds
December 07, 2016 16:50


Equinox Funds Launches the Equinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund - The First Mutual Fund to Leverage Aspect Capital's Trend Following Strategy Expertise
November 13, 2014 13:01


Equinox Funds Teams With BlueCrest Capital Management, LLP to Launch the Equinox BlueCrest Systematic Macro Fund -- EBCIX
June 24, 2014 09:00






219



other news releases in

Directors and Officers

in the last 30 days
                            











Profile

Equinox Funds





  Subscribe via RSS
 Subscribe via ATOM
 Javascript



  Princeton, New Jersey, UNITED STATES
  http://equinoxfundmanagement.com




Contact Data
Media Contact:
Eva Mansson-Blair
Tel: 303-991-6770







Media Files



Equinox Funds  Logo






LOGO URL | Copy the link below
            





Formats available:






                            Original
                        




                            Medium
                        




                            Small
                        








Tags
CORPORATE














Newswire Distribution Network & Management



Home
Newsroom
RSS Feeds
Legal
Contact Us






About Us
GlobeNewswire, a Nasdaq company, is one of the world's largest newswire distribution networks, specializing in the delivery of corporate press releases financial disclosures and multimedia content to the media, investment community, individual investors and the general public.
            




Contact Us


Corporate Headquarters
2321 Rosecrans Avenue.
Suite 2200
El Segundo, CA 90245
Phone: (800) 307-6627
Fax:  (800) 307-3567
            


European Headquarters
Woolgate Exchange,
25 Basinghall Street,
London EC2V 5HA
UK
Phone: +1 866-465-8454




© 2017 GlobeNewswire, Inc. All Rights Reserved.





 








Aspect - In the Media Promo Page | Equinox Funds
























































Home
Our Firm
Contact



  







StrategiesSingle-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund
Equinox BH-DG Strategy Fund
Equinox Campbell Strategy Fund
Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
Equinox Crabel Strategy Fund
Equinox IPM Systematic Macro Fund
Equinox Systematica Macro Fund

Multi-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund
Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund

Commodity PoolsMulti-StrategyEquinox Frontier Diversified Fund
Equinox Frontier Long/Short Commodity Fund
Equinox Frontier Masters Fund

Multi-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Balanced Fund
Equinox Frontier Heritage Fund
Equinox Frontier Select Fund

Single-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Winton Fund



Performance
Thought LeadershipFeaturedPress Play SeriesManaged Futures and CTAs: A SmorgasbordManaged Futures During Equity "Crises"—An UpdateWhy Managed Futures?The Press Play Series is an Advisor resource to assist when explaining investment related topics to clients.
It is important to understand that not all futures-trading strategies fall under the managed futures umbrella as conventionally defined.
The historical performance of equities and managed futures during times of crisis, including the most recent example, December 2015 – January 2016.
Created as a tool for Advisors, this client friendly presentation provides a succinct overview of the asset class and examines the impact managed futures can have throughout several market environments.

Fund Literature & Forms
News, Media & Events



  







You are hereEquinox Funds/ Aspect - In the Media Promo Page 

 













Aspect Stays True to Trend


The Hedge Fund Journal sits down with Aspect Capital’s Anthony Todd, co-founder & CEO, and Martin Lueck, co-founder and Research Director, to discuss the Firm’s history, research process, and what they believe sets them apart from hundreds of other CTAs.
“Performance apart, what differentiates Aspect from the many hundreds of other CTAs and managed futures funds. Longevity is one factor. Aspect was co-founded in 1997 but its track record dates back much longer to the early 1980s.”
Aspect Capital is the commodity trading advisor for the Equinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund.
 

READ FULL ARTICLE


Aspect Stays True to Trend
Non-trend strategies launched separately
The Hedge Fund Journal




WATCH VIDEO


Aspect's management explains what sets their firm apart. 
Bloomberg TV





Aspect's management explains what sets their firm apart. 
Bloomberg TV



 





 
 


 






 

ASPECT CAPITAL

• Headquartered in London, England
• $6.3b in assets under
	    management as of 6/30/2017
• Known for their medium term         trend-following approach
 







A WORD ABOUT RISK
Investors should carefully consider the investment objective, risks, changes, and expenses of the Fund. This and other important information about the Fund is contained in the Fund’s Prospectus or Summary Prospectus which can be obtained by calling 1.888.643.3431. The Prospectus or Summary Prospectus should be read carefully before investing.
INVESTMENTS IN MANAGED FUTURES MUTUAL FUNDS ENTAIL CERTAIN RISKS INCLUDING POSSIBLE LOSS OF PRINCIPAL AND ARE NOT SUITABLE FOR ALL INVESTORS.
There is no guarantee the fund will achieve its objectives.
The Fund is distributed by Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA/SIPC. Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and featured Commodity Trading Advisors are not affiliated with Northern Lights Distributors, LLC.
Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP serves as the Fund’s investment advisor. SECURITIES OFFERED THROUGH EQUINOX GROUP DISTRIBUTORS, LLC, MEMBER FINRA. To obtain more information, contact Equinox Funds at 1.877.837.0600 or info@equinoxfunds.com.
The material provided on this website is for informational purposes only. It does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy any security or service in any jurisdiction where such transaction would be unauthorized or unlawful.
5300-NLD-05/25/2016
 



  

 


 








Terms & conditions | Equinox Funds
























































Home
Our Firm
Contact



  







StrategiesSingle-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund
Equinox BH-DG Strategy Fund
Equinox Campbell Strategy Fund
Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
Equinox Crabel Strategy Fund
Equinox IPM Systematic Macro Fund
Equinox Systematica Macro Fund

Multi-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund
Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund

Commodity PoolsMulti-StrategyEquinox Frontier Diversified Fund
Equinox Frontier Long/Short Commodity Fund
Equinox Frontier Masters Fund

Multi-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Balanced Fund
Equinox Frontier Heritage Fund
Equinox Frontier Select Fund

Single-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Winton Fund



Performance
Thought LeadershipFeaturedPress Play SeriesManaged Futures and CTAs: A SmorgasbordManaged Futures During Equity "Crises"—An UpdateWhy Managed Futures?The Press Play Series is an Advisor resource to assist when explaining investment related topics to clients.
It is important to understand that not all futures-trading strategies fall under the managed futures umbrella as conventionally defined.
The historical performance of equities and managed futures during times of crisis, including the most recent example, December 2015 – January 2016.
Created as a tool for Advisors, this client friendly presentation provides a succinct overview of the asset class and examines the impact managed futures can have throughout several market environments.

Fund Literature & Forms
News, Media & Events



  







You are hereEquinox Funds/ Terms & conditions 

 











Terms & conditions

Index
1. Site Ownership and Operation
2. Applicability of T&Cs
3. Content Does Not Consist of Investment Advice or Recommendations
4. Offer by Prospectus Only
5. Hypothetical Performance
6. Jurisdictional Information and Geographic Limitations
7. Acceptance and Modification of T&Cs
8. Monitoring of Site
9. Third-Party Sources and Information
10. Intellectual Property
11. Prohibited Uses
12. Limitation of Liability
13. Limitations on Exclusions of Warranties
14. Severability
15. Governing Law
16. Entire Agreement
17. Captions
18. Modification and Termination of Service
19. Internet Security
20. Copy of T&Cs
21. How You Can Correct and Update Personal Information
1. Site Ownership and Operation
a. This Site is owned and operated by Equinox Fund Management, LLC, either alone or in conjunction with our affiliates, agents or partners (collectively, “Equinox Fund Management,” “we,” “us” or words of similar import).
b. This Site is intended to be available only to persons that accept the T&Cs (as defined below). Such persons and duly authorized representatives are referred to in these T&Cs as “users” or “you” and by words of similar import. It is the responsibility of users to take reasonable steps to cause their respective representatives to comply with these T&Cs. Each user is requested to bring to our attention promptly any aspect of the material on, or the functionality of, this Site that is not to the user’s satisfaction or appears defective in any way.
c. The terms “Equinox Fund Management, LLC Web Site” and this “Site” mean the web site having a Uniform Resource Locator (or URL) of equinoxfunds.com, ctaperformance.com and onmanagedfutures.com.  We endeavor to maintain this Site and its operation to the highest standards, but we are not, and cannot be, responsible for the results of any defects that may exist in the Site or its operation. As to the operation of the Site, we expressly disclaim all warranties of any kind, whether express or implied, including, but not limited to, the implied warranties of merchantability and fitness for a particular purpose. We make no warranty that (i) the operation of the Site will meet the user's requirements; (ii) access to the Site will be uninterrupted, timely, secure, free of viruses or other harmful components, or free of errors; (iii) the results that may be obtained from the use of the Site will be accurate or reliable; or (iv) defects will be corrected. You (and not we) assume the entire cost of all servicing, repair, or correction that may be necessary for your computer equipment and software as a result of any viruses, errors or other problems you may have as a result of visiting this Site.
2. Applicability of T&Cs
a. These T&Cs apply to the use of this Site and to the use through this Site of the various features that are accessible, or may become accessible in the future, from this Site (collectively, “Features”). The use of some or all of the Features may be subject to disclosures or disclaimers that are contained within or linked to those Features.
b. There may be provisions in separate subscription and account agreements, if any, executed between Equinox Fund Management or its affiliates and you which govern aspects of the use of this Site. If there is an inconsistency between these T&Cs and any such agreements, the inconsistency will be resolved in favor of the agreements.
3. Content Does Not Consist of Investment Advice or Recommendations
a. This Site and its contents are for informational purposes only. If you wish to obtain further details about any information contained on this Site, please contact us using the information at “About Us.”
b. You alone will need to evaluate the merits and risks associated with the use of this Site. Decisions based on information obtained from this Site or the use of the Features are your sole responsibility, and before making any decision on the basis of this information, you should consider (with or without the assistance of a financial, legal, tax or other adviser) whether the information is appropriate in light of your particular investment needs, objectives and financial circumstances.
c. Although this Site may provide information relating to approaches to investing or types of securities and investments you might buy, sell or hold, no information available through this Site is intended or should be construed as any advice, recommendation or endorsement from us as to any legal, tax, investment or other matter. Nothing on this Site shall be considered a solicitation or offer to buy or sell any security, future, option or other financial instrument or to offer or provide any investment advice or service to any person in any jurisdiction. Nothing contained on this Site constitutes or should be construed as investment advice or an opinion with respect to the suitability of any security. In preparing the information contained in this Site, we have not taken into account the investment needs, objectives and financial circumstances of any particular person. Some or all alternative investment programs may not be suitable for certain investors.
d. Any views expressed on this Site by us were prepared based upon the information available to us at the time such views were written. Changed or additional information could cause such views to change. All information is subject to possible correction. Information may quickly become unreliable for various reasons, including changes in market conditions or economic circumstances. If an investment is denominated in a currency other than the recipient's currency, changes in the rates of exchange may have an adverse effect on value, price or income. The levels and bases of taxation may also change from time to time.
e. This Site contains performance information, which may include rates of return for the various Portfolios (as defined in Section 4 below), investment strategies forming a part thereof, statistical analyses and the like. You are cautioned that past performance is not necessarily indicative of future results. In addition, certain performance information set forth on this Site may be simulated or hypothetical. No representation is being made that any investment product will or is likely to achieve profits or losses similar to those shown.
f. The content and any materials made available through this web site are provided "as is" and without warranties of any kind, either express or implied. To the fullest extent permissible pursuant to applicable law, we disclaim all warranties, express or implied, including, but not limited to, all implied warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, title and non-infringement. We do not warrant or make any representations regarding the use or the results of the use of the materials in this web site in terms of their correctness, accuracy, reliability or otherwise. The materials in this web site could include technical inaccuracies or typographical errors. These materials could become inaccurate as a result of developments occurring after their respective dates. We undertake no obligation to maintain the currency of such information.
4. Offer by Prospectus Only
The information on this Site does not constitute an offer of a partnership interest, share in a company, or a managed account in a portfolio (“Portfolios”, and each such interest, share or managed account, a “Portfolio Interest”) (or any other financial instrument), which offer may be made only by means of an approved Prospectus, as applicable. The Prospectus will not be sent to any person to whom it is unlawful to make an offer or solicitation. The material terms and risks associated with an investment in the PortfolioInterests are disclosed in the Prospectus.
5. Hypothetical Performance
Hypothetical performance results have many inherent limitations, some of which are described below. No representation is being made that any account will or is likely to achieve profits or losses similar to those shown. In fact, there are frequently sharp differences between hypothetical performance results and the actual results subsequently achieved by any particular trading program.
One of the limitations of hypothetical performance results is that they are generally prepared with the benefit of hindsight. In addition, hypothetical trading does not involve financial risk, and no hypothetical trading record can completely account for the impact of financial risk in actual trading. For example, the ability to withstand losses or to adhere to a particular trading program in spite of trading losses are material points which can also adversely affect actual trading results. There are numerous other factors related to the markets in general or to the implementation of any specific trading program which cannot be fully accounted for in the preparation of hypothetical performance results and all of which can adversely affect actual trading results.
6. Jurisdictional Information and Geographic Limitations
Unless otherwise specified, we control and operate this Site from our offices within the State of Colorado, United States of America. The information available at this Site, including the description of the services and products referred to on this Site, is restricted in certain jurisdictions. Not all products and services are available in all geographic areas. Your eligibility for particular products and services is subject to local law and regulation. Persons who access this Site do so on their own initiative. Accordingly, persons who access this Site are required by Equinox Fund Management to inform themselves about and observe such restrictions. This information is not intended for distribution to, or use within, any jurisdiction, or use by any person, where such distribution or use would constitute a violation of law or regulation or would subject Equinox Fund Management to any additional registration registration requirement within such jurisdiction beyond being registered as a commodity trading advisor with the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission and an affiliate registered as a broker-dealer in the state of Colorado. Persons interested in acquiring PortfolioInterests should inform themselves as to: (a) the legal requirements within the countries of their nationality, residence, ordinary residence or domicile for such acquisitions; (b) any foreign exchange restriction or exchange control requirements which they might encounter on acquisition or disposal of Portfolio Interests; and (c) the taxation consequences which might be relevant to the acquisition, holding or disposal of PortfolioInterests under the laws of the countries of their citizenship, residence or domicile.
7. Acceptance and Modification of T&Cs
These T&Cs are accepted either by selecting the "I Accept and Acknowledge" button provided or by continued use of the Site. Acceptance by any representative of an entity is acceptance by that entity. In addition, selecting “I Accept and Acknowledge” will also indicate the acknowledgment of having reviewed the Prospectus. We reserve the right, at our discretion, to change these T&Cs at any time. The T&Cs can be accessed from links on the home (or index) page and other pages of this Site. If you use this Site after we post changes to these T&Cs, you accept the changed terms. We may also offer other services from time to time that are governed by different terms and conditions. Certain segments of the site are restricted to financial professionals or qualified persons. If you enter any such area of the Site, you further agree to be bound by the additional restrictions that may be provided there.
8. Monitoring of Site
We expressly reserve the right to monitor any and all use of this Site. We are under no obligation to do so and assume no responsibility or liability arising from the use of this Site. Our communications via e-mail from this Site are not encrypted. You acknowledge that there is a risk that data, including e-mail, electronic communications and personal data, may be accessed by unauthorized third parties when communicated between you and us.
9. Third-Party Sources and Information
a. All Portfolio information, index data, prices, averages, quotations, performance data, financial market information, and other such information available on this Site (collectively, "Informational Content"), are obtained by Equinox Fund Management from, or are compiled by Equinox Fund Management based on, sources believed to be reliable. Due to the number of sources from which the Informational Content is obtained, possible human error, possible mechanical error and the hazards associated with electronic distribution, there may be delays in transmitting and publishing the Informational Content, and the Informational Content may contain omissions, inaccuracies or other errors. Equinox Fund Management does not endorse, or take responsibility for, any third party's information, services or products. Equinox Fund Management may have business relationships with such third parties, including vendor relationships in connection with the Portfolios. No representation is made that any such third party is an “independent” authority in respect of any Informational Content prepared by such third party. All use of, or reliance on, such Informational Content is at your own risk.
b. We are not responsible for the content of any web site owned by a third party that may be linked to this Site via hyperlink, whether such hyperlink is provided by us or by a third party, including specifically content that may be obtained by the use of Features that are hyperlinked to this Site. We provide such links only as a convenience to you, and have not tested any software or verified any information found at such web sites, including the content of any prospectus or sales literature contained on such web sites (except with respect to a Prospectus or sales literature prepared by us).
c. By providing access to other web sites, we are not recommending the purchase or sale of any security or investment referenced on any such web site, nor are we endorsing any such web site or the products or services provided by any web site's sponsoring organization. All use of, or reliance on, third parties' web sites, content, products and services is at your own risk. Equinox Fund Management reserves the right to terminate any third party link, information, services or products at any time.
d. Certain links in this web site may link you to other sites on the World Wide Web. The linked sites are not under our control and we are not responsible for the contents of any linked site or any link contained in a linked site or any changes or updates to such sites. We are not responsible for webcasting or any other form of transmission received from any linked site. We are providing these links to you only as a convenience, and the inclusion of any link does not imply a referral by us to, or an endorsement by us of, the linked site.
10. Intellectual Property
The content available through this Site, including, but not limited to, the Informational Content; images; charts; graphs; graphics; designs; photographs; audio and video clips; any Marks (as defined below); software and HTML code (collectively, the "Content") are, except as otherwise explicitly noted, the property of Equinox Fund Management or its licensors (as the case may be) and are subject to protection by U.S. and international intellectual property laws and treaty provisions, including, but not limited to, those relating to patent rights, copyrights, trade secrets, trade names, trademarks, service marks, moral rights, know-how and any other similar rights. Subject to these T&Cs, and except as expressly indicated otherwise herein or on this Site, you agree not to download, copy, store, manipulate, reformat, modify, adapt, reproduce, retransmit, distribute, circulate, display, publish, perform, sell, rent, print or create derivative works from, or make any other use of the Content (or any portion thereof) without the prior written approval of Equinox Fund Management. The preceding sentence prohibits you from, among other things, posting any Content to forums, list services, newsgroups, mailing lists and electronic bulletin boards without the prior written approval of Equinox Fund Management. You are solely responsible for any data, text, software or other materials that you upload, post, e-mail or otherwise make available using this Site.
Nothing in these T&Cs grants you a license to develop, create or offer any financial products or services based on any of the Content found on this Site. To the extent approved by Equinox Fund Management, you are authorized to use and download materials that are made available on this Site only for your own needs. You may not use, distribute, modify, transmit or post any Content obtained from the use of this Site or any functions of this Site for public or commercial purposes, including any text, images, audio, or video without our express written permission. Specifically, you are not authorized to resell access to any such materials or to redistribute or facilitate the redistribution of any such materials for sale to others. You may not delete copyright or other intellectual property rights and proprietary notices from printouts of electronically accessed materials.
You agree and acknowledge that all trademarks, service marks, logos, names and titles, (collectively, the “Marks”) on this Site and within the Content are proprietary to their respective owners and are protected by applicable trademark and copyright law. Nothing on this Site should be construed as granting any license or right to use any of the Marks displayed on this Site. Any unauthorized use of the Marks or any other Content is strictly prohibited. If you would like to obtain permission to make use of this Site in a way that is not permitted by these T&Cs, please send a request to do so in writing using the information on the “About Us” page.
11. Prohibited Uses
Users may not:
a. transmit any order for purchase or sale of Portfolio Interests using the Site e-mail facility.
b. use this Site to commit criminal or civil violations of federal, state, local or international laws, regulations or other government requirements. Equinox Fund Management reserves the right to report any activity that may violate any law or regulation to appropriate law enforcement officials, regulators or other third parties.
c. violate, or attempt to violate, this Site, including uploading, posting, e-mailing or otherwise transmitting any material that contains viruses or any other computer code, files or programs that might interrupt, limit or interfere with the functionality of any computer software or hardware or the telecommunications equipment that is owned, leased or used by us.
d. use this Site for the distribution of any offensive materials or any advertising or promotional materials, including without limitation, "junk mail," "surveys," "spam," "chain letters," "pyramid schemes" or any other form of solicitation or unauthorized communication.
e. copy, post, reproduce, transmit, upload, republish or distribute in any way material from this site in any manner inconsistent with the purposes for which we offer it.
f. without our express written permission, copy, modify or display our name, or any text, graphic images or other content from this site.
g. without our express written permission, redeliver any of the pages, text, images or other content of this Site using "framing," redirection or similar technology or otherwise deliver this Site in a manner that does not maintain the integrity of the layout, content and look and feel of this Site.
h. include any trademark, trade name or service mark of ours, the name of any of our personnel, or any variation of any of the foregoing, as any other indicator that may create a likelihood or confusion or a false or misleading impression of affiliation, sponsorship or endorsement between us and any user and/or web site.
i. upload, post, reproduce or distribute any information, software or other material protected by copyright or any other intellectual property right (as well as rights of publicity and privacy) without first obtaining the permission of the owner of such rights.
j. archive this site.
12. Limitation of Liability
Under no circumstances shall we be liable for any damages or injury, including any direct, special, incidental, consequential or punitive damages, that may result from the use of, or the inability to use, the materials in this web site, whether in an action of contract, negligence or other tortuous action, arising out of or in connection with the use or performance of information available in the web site. We shall not be liable even if we or an authorized representative of ours has been advised of the possibility of such damages. These include, but are not limited to, damages or injury caused by error, omission, interruption, defect, failure of performance, delay in operation or transmission, line failure or computer virus or other harmful component.
13. Limitations on Exclusion of Warranties
Applicable law may not allow the exclusion of certain warranties or the limitation or exclusion of liability for incidental or consequential damages. Accordingly, some of the above limitations or exclusions may not apply to you. However, in no event shall our total liability to you for damages, losses, and causes of action (whether in contract, tort [including, but not limited to, negligence], or otherwise) exceed the amount paid by you, if any, for accessing this web site.
14. Severability
If any provision of these T&Cs shall be held to be unlawful, void, invalid or unenforceable by any court, or regulatory or self-regulatory agency or body, such condition shall attach only to such provision. The validity of the remaining provisions shall not be affected thereby and these T&Cs shall be carried out as if any such unlawful, void, invalid or unenforceable provision were not contained herein.
15. Governing Law
The laws of the State of Colorado will apply to all matters relating to these T&Cs, and they shall not be governed by the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sales of Goods. These T&Cs shall be construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Colorado, without giving effect to any principles or rules of conflicts of laws to the extent such principles or rules are not mandatorily applicable by statute or would require or permit the application of the laws of other jurisdictions, as to all matters, including, but not limited to, matters of validity, construction, effect, performance and remedies. In connection with any litigation, without limiting Equinox Fund Management’s right to bring an action against you in any jurisdiction, you further agree to submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of and venue in the federal and state courts located in the County of Denver, Colorado. Any claim or cause of action you may have arising out of or related to the use of this Site or these T&Cs must be filed within one year after such claim or cause of action arose regardless of any statute or law to the contrary.
16. Entire Agreement
This Agreement, including any Appendices hereto and all agreements and policies incorporated herein by reference or by hyperlink, as they may be amended from time to time by us, including, but not limited to, posting such amendments on this Site, constitutes the complete and exclusive agreement between Equinox Fund Management and you with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes supersedes all prior discussions, understandings and agreements with respect to the subject matter hereof.
17. Captions
Captions in no way define, limit, extend or describe, nor should they be deemed relevant to the interpretation of, or the scope of these T&Cs or the effect of any of its provisions.
18. Modification and Termination of Service
a. We reserve the right to modify or discontinue all or any portion of this Site or any Feature made available thereby at any time without prior notice. The Site may also be unavailable during periods of maintenance or for other reasons.
b. We may block access to the use of all or any portion of this Site or any such Feature without prior notice in the event we elect to discontinue such service on a temporary or permanent basis or in the event that you breach these T&Cs. We also reserve the right to block access to all or any portion of this Site if we have reason to believe that the general security and/or integrity of the system is being compromised.
c. We are not required to make available or to continue to make available this Site, and, in particular, to residents of any non-U.S. jurisdiction where we determine, in our sole discretion, that furnishing this Site might be unlawful under the laws of such non-U.S. jurisdiction or the laws of the U.S., or compliance with either of such laws is impracticable or commercially unreasonable.
d. We reserve the right to prohibit or restrict a particular user’s access to this Site, without giving notice of, or a reason for, such action.
19. Internet Security
Equinox uses the latest encryption technology, SSL, to protect private information transferred between your computer and Equinox.  You can establish a private, 6+-digit PIN, which you can change anytime. That way, you’re in control of your PIN.  You can terminate online access at any time by telephone. You can reestablish this access anytime as well. For added security, access revoked by telephone must be reestablished by telephone. Online access will be suspended after three unsuccessful logon attempts.
a. How We Secure Online Account Access
To prevent unauthorized access to your Equinox account via your computer, sessions with equinoxllc.com are automatically terminated after 30 minutes of inactivity. If you’d like to continue after this point in time, simply log on again.
b. Physical Security
Equinox provides leading edge technology to ensure that all information transmitted is safe and secure. Information is stored on a secure record keeping system that is located in secured areas of the buildings we occupy. All record keeping systems are located in a controlled area, with physical access limited to authorized persons. Authorized personnel escort visitors into controlled areas at all times. Employees of Equinox may, from time to time, have access to this information in order to fulfill our service commitment to you. However, physical access to the controlled areas is logged and each employee, upon employment with Equinox, is required to sign a security agreement concerning their individual duty to safeguard confidential data.
c. Cookies
Equinox may assign your computer browser a unique random identifier called a “cookie.” Doing so does not compromise your privacy or security in any way. We will simply use the data collected by the cookie to improve your Web experience and to evaluate the site’s services and features.
d. Encryption Technology
Equinox policy ensures that all information traveling between our server and your browser is encrypted. The degree of encryption depends on the browser of the user. Netscape Navigator 7.1, Microsoft Internet Explorer 6.0 and America Online 9.0 all support 128-bit encryption (strongest security). If your browser is an older version of Netscape Navigator, for example, your browser may only support 40-bit encryption, which is not as secure. Newer versions of Netscape Navigator 7.1, Microsoft Internet Explorer 6.0 and America Online 9.0 are downloadable of the Internet. Each browser contains an icon describing whether the connection is secure or not. If you are using Netscape Navigator 3x, a "broken" key icon depicts an insecure connection while a "whole" key icon depicts a secure connection. Netscape Communicator, Microsoft Internet Explorer, and AOL all use an "open" lock icon to depict an insecure connection and a "closed" lock icon to depict a secure connection. An additional method of determining if a page is secure is to look at the address. If the address begins with HTTPS (rather than the standard HTTP) the page is secure.
e. Secure Socket Layer (SSL)
Equinox is currently using SSL to transmit secure documents. SSL is a Netscape developed technology that allows for the transfer of encrypted code from our server to your computer. The following is a list of some of the browsers that support SSL technology: Netscape Navigator 7.1, Microsoft Internet 6.0, and AOL Web browser 9.0.
f. Firewalls
For additional security, Equinox has installed firewalls that filter Internet traffic preventing the unauthorized access of personal data. If you have any question regarding any of the security features at Equinox please call 1-800-820-0888 between 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. MST Mondays through Fridays
20. Copy of T&Cs
You may use your browser to download and/or print out a copy of these T&Cs for your records. However, we reserve all our copyrights in the T&Cs.
21. How You Can Correct and Update Personal Information
If you need to update or correct any personal information, you may contact us at 1.877.837.0600.
Comments and Questions Should be forwarded to:
Equinox Fund Management
	1775 Sherman St., Suite 2500
	Denver, CO 80203
	Telephone: 1.877.837.0600
	Fax: 303.832.9354
	Email: invest@equinoxfundmanagement.com
 
 
 


 

















 



PAST PERFORMANCE IS NOT INDICATIVE OF FUTURE RESULTS. THERE IS RISK OF LOSS. YOU CAN LOSE MONEY IN A MANAGED FUTURES PROGRAM.
Investors should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the Funds. This and other important information about the Funds are in the relevant Prospectuses which can be obtained by calling 1.877.837.0600 The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.
Administration: For the Equinox Frontier Funds, Administration: For the Equinox Frontier Funds, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages NAV administration and Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages Transfer Agency Administration. Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC are not affiliated with Gemini Fund Services, LLC. For the Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund, Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund, and the Equinox Alternative Strategy Platform, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages all accounting, administration, and compliance matters for the Trust. Gemini Fund Services, LLC is not affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC or Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP.The mutual funds are distributed by Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA/SIPC.
Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC are not affiliated with Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, or Gemini Fund Services, LLC.
 



  

 


 








About Equinox Funds | Equinox Funds
























































Home
Our Firm
Contact



  







StrategiesSingle-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund
Equinox BH-DG Strategy Fund
Equinox Campbell Strategy Fund
Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
Equinox Crabel Strategy Fund
Equinox IPM Systematic Macro Fund
Equinox Systematica Macro Fund

Multi-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund
Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund

Commodity PoolsMulti-StrategyEquinox Frontier Diversified Fund
Equinox Frontier Long/Short Commodity Fund
Equinox Frontier Masters Fund

Multi-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Balanced Fund
Equinox Frontier Heritage Fund
Equinox Frontier Select Fund

Single-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Winton Fund



Performance
Thought LeadershipFeaturedPress Play SeriesManaged Futures and CTAs: A SmorgasbordManaged Futures During Equity "Crises"—An UpdateWhy Managed Futures?The Press Play Series is an Advisor resource to assist when explaining investment related topics to clients.
It is important to understand that not all futures-trading strategies fall under the managed futures umbrella as conventionally defined.
The historical performance of equities and managed futures during times of crisis, including the most recent example, December 2015 – January 2016.
Created as a tool for Advisors, this client friendly presentation provides a succinct overview of the asset class and examines the impact managed futures can have throughout several market environments.

Fund Literature & Forms
News, Media & Events



  







You are hereEquinox Funds/ About Equinox Funds 

 













About Equinox Funds

At Equinox Funds, we are pioneers in developing investor-friendly alternatives, such as the first multi-strategy managed futures mutual fund. We started with managed futures because we believe they are the single most powerful diversifier for a portfolio of stocks and bonds. But we’ve also moved into other alternative assets such as hedged equities, which can potentially help reduce risk and enhance the returns of an overall portfolio over time.
With a deep research culture, our mission is to bring the potential benefits of alternatives to institutions and individuals by offering diverse investment strategies that can help meet the unique goals of each investor, including:  
Commodity Pools
Multi-Strategy Mutual Funds
Single-Strategy Mutual Funds
Specialized Institutional Solutions
In addition to our alternative investment offerings, specific services for institutions, family groups, trusts, charitable foundations and pension funds are provided through the Equinox Institutional Asset Management division. Equinox Institutional is an investment advisor that specializes in the construction, implementation and monitoring of multi-manager portfolios as well as the evaluation of traditional equity and fixed income strategies within an overall portfolio construction framework.
Averaging 20 years of hedge fund and managed futures investing experience, the Equinox Institutional portfolio management team has deep research capabilities and a strong track record managing large, multi-strategy portfolios across the entire spectrum of liquid alternatives, including:
Managed futures
Equity long-short
Arbitrage
Sector specific
Emerging managers
Customized institutional mandates
Research and Development
Our research and development group, Equinox Financial Solutions, is responsible for the design and customization of innovative products and solutions that seek to meet the needs of leading financial institutions across the globe.  The team’s broad research capabilities, industry connectivity and product development expertise facilitate the structuring of highly-customized products that attempt to meet bespoke needs that cannot be met through standard investment vehicles.  Led by John E. Pallat III, co-founder of Equinox Funds, our research and development team has been involved in the design of Equinox’s mutual funds and other offerings including but not limited to:
Structured products
UCITS
Commodity Pools
Unit Investment Trusts  
 
 
 
 
 


 






About Us
History
Corporate Structure
Team
News, Media & Events



 



Equinox Funds Capabilities Brochure


 Web Version |              Print Version  


 



PAST PERFORMANCE IS NOT INDICATIVE OF FUTURE RESULTS. THERE IS RISK OF LOSS. YOU CAN LOSE MONEY IN A MANAGED FUTURES PROGRAM.
Investors should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the Funds. This and other important information about the Funds are in the relevant Prospectuses which can be obtained by calling 1.877.837.0600 The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.
Administration: For the Equinox Frontier Funds, Administration: For the Equinox Frontier Funds, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages NAV administration and Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages Transfer Agency Administration. Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC are not affiliated with Gemini Fund Services, LLC. For the Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund, Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund, and the Equinox Alternative Strategy Platform, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages all accounting, administration, and compliance matters for the Trust. Gemini Fund Services, LLC is not affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC or Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP.The mutual funds are distributed by Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA/SIPC.
Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC are not affiliated with Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, or Gemini Fund Services, LLC.
2994-NLD-12/05/2013 / 1319-NLD-7/29/2015
	EFM664
 



  

 


 








About Equinox Funds | Equinox Funds
























































Home
Our Firm
Contact



  







StrategiesSingle-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund
Equinox BH-DG Strategy Fund
Equinox Campbell Strategy Fund
Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
Equinox Crabel Strategy Fund
Equinox IPM Systematic Macro Fund
Equinox Systematica Macro Fund

Multi-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund
Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund

Commodity PoolsMulti-StrategyEquinox Frontier Diversified Fund
Equinox Frontier Long/Short Commodity Fund
Equinox Frontier Masters Fund

Multi-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Balanced Fund
Equinox Frontier Heritage Fund
Equinox Frontier Select Fund

Single-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Winton Fund



Performance
Thought LeadershipFeaturedPress Play SeriesManaged Futures and CTAs: A SmorgasbordManaged Futures During Equity "Crises"—An UpdateWhy Managed Futures?The Press Play Series is an Advisor resource to assist when explaining investment related topics to clients.
It is important to understand that not all futures-trading strategies fall under the managed futures umbrella as conventionally defined.
The historical performance of equities and managed futures during times of crisis, including the most recent example, December 2015 – January 2016.
Created as a tool for Advisors, this client friendly presentation provides a succinct overview of the asset class and examines the impact managed futures can have throughout several market environments.

Fund Literature & Forms
News, Media & Events



  







You are hereEquinox Funds/ About Equinox Funds 

 













About Equinox Funds

At Equinox Funds, we are pioneers in developing investor-friendly alternatives, such as the first multi-strategy managed futures mutual fund. We started with managed futures because we believe they are the single most powerful diversifier for a portfolio of stocks and bonds. But we’ve also moved into other alternative assets such as hedged equities, which can potentially help reduce risk and enhance the returns of an overall portfolio over time.
With a deep research culture, our mission is to bring the potential benefits of alternatives to institutions and individuals by offering diverse investment strategies that can help meet the unique goals of each investor, including:  
Commodity Pools
Multi-Strategy Mutual Funds
Single-Strategy Mutual Funds
Specialized Institutional Solutions
In addition to our alternative investment offerings, specific services for institutions, family groups, trusts, charitable foundations and pension funds are provided through the Equinox Institutional Asset Management division. Equinox Institutional is an investment advisor that specializes in the construction, implementation and monitoring of multi-manager portfolios as well as the evaluation of traditional equity and fixed income strategies within an overall portfolio construction framework.
Averaging 20 years of hedge fund and managed futures investing experience, the Equinox Institutional portfolio management team has deep research capabilities and a strong track record managing large, multi-strategy portfolios across the entire spectrum of liquid alternatives, including:
Managed futures
Equity long-short
Arbitrage
Sector specific
Emerging managers
Customized institutional mandates
Research and Development
Our research and development group, Equinox Financial Solutions, is responsible for the design and customization of innovative products and solutions that seek to meet the needs of leading financial institutions across the globe.  The team’s broad research capabilities, industry connectivity and product development expertise facilitate the structuring of highly-customized products that attempt to meet bespoke needs that cannot be met through standard investment vehicles.  Led by John E. Pallat III, co-founder of Equinox Funds, our research and development team has been involved in the design of Equinox’s mutual funds and other offerings including but not limited to:
Structured products
UCITS
Commodity Pools
Unit Investment Trusts  
 
 
 
 
 


 






About Us
History
Corporate Structure
Team
News, Media & Events



 



Equinox Funds Capabilities Brochure


 Web Version |              Print Version  


 



PAST PERFORMANCE IS NOT INDICATIVE OF FUTURE RESULTS. THERE IS RISK OF LOSS. YOU CAN LOSE MONEY IN A MANAGED FUTURES PROGRAM.
Investors should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the Funds. This and other important information about the Funds are in the relevant Prospectuses which can be obtained by calling 1.877.837.0600 The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.
Administration: For the Equinox Frontier Funds, Administration: For the Equinox Frontier Funds, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages NAV administration and Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages Transfer Agency Administration. Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC are not affiliated with Gemini Fund Services, LLC. For the Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund, Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund, and the Equinox Alternative Strategy Platform, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages all accounting, administration, and compliance matters for the Trust. Gemini Fund Services, LLC is not affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC or Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP.The mutual funds are distributed by Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA/SIPC.
Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC are not affiliated with Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, or Gemini Fund Services, LLC.
2994-NLD-12/05/2013 / 1319-NLD-7/29/2015
	EFM664
 



  

 


 








News, Media & Events | Equinox Funds
























































Home
Our Firm
Contact



  







StrategiesSingle-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund
Equinox BH-DG Strategy Fund
Equinox Campbell Strategy Fund
Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
Equinox Crabel Strategy Fund
Equinox IPM Systematic Macro Fund
Equinox Systematica Macro Fund

Multi-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund
Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund

Commodity PoolsMulti-StrategyEquinox Frontier Diversified Fund
Equinox Frontier Long/Short Commodity Fund
Equinox Frontier Masters Fund

Multi-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Balanced Fund
Equinox Frontier Heritage Fund
Equinox Frontier Select Fund

Single-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Winton Fund



Performance
Thought LeadershipFeaturedPress Play SeriesManaged Futures and CTAs: A SmorgasbordManaged Futures During Equity "Crises"—An UpdateWhy Managed Futures?The Press Play Series is an Advisor resource to assist when explaining investment related topics to clients.
It is important to understand that not all futures-trading strategies fall under the managed futures umbrella as conventionally defined.
The historical performance of equities and managed futures during times of crisis, including the most recent example, December 2015 – January 2016.
Created as a tool for Advisors, this client friendly presentation provides a succinct overview of the asset class and examines the impact managed futures can have throughout several market environments.

Fund Literature & Forms
News, Media & Events



  







You are hereEquinox Funds/ News, Media & Events 

 













News, Media & Events

Most Recent News 
 
Major Structural Change to the Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
July 26, 2017 – Shareholders have approved a new fee structure in which Chesapeake Capital will be a sub-advisor to the Fund, managing a portion of the Fund’s assets more directly, and not be paid any additional advisory fee or performance-based incentive fee. 



 
‘Best Multi-Manager Fund’
The Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund is named the Best Multi-Manager Fund award at the 2017 CTA US Performance Awards.



 
Jerry Parker, CEO & Founder of Chesapeake Capital on The Meb Faber Show (Podcast). 
Earlier this year (2017) Jerry sat down as a guest with Meb Faber, host of The Meb Faber Show (Podcast), and discussed “Turtle Trading,” trend-following, and Jerry’s use of Twitter as his diary. Click here for some clips from Episode 35.


Older News 
 
Aspect in the Media
Bloomberg TV and The Hedge Fund Journal  feature Anthony Todd and Martin Lueck, of Aspect Capital.



 
'Best Managed Futures CTA over $1Billion'
Aspect Capital Limited wins 'Best Managed Futures CTA over $1Billion' for its European flagship fund for the second consecutive year (2015, 2016) at the HFM European Performance Awards.2



 
Meet the Most Powerful Woman in Hedge Funds
Articles on CNBC.com highlight Ms. Braga, who currently manages more than $7 billion and is the head commodity trading advisor behind the Equinox Systematica Macro Fund.



 
 


 






About Us
History
Corporate Structure
Team
News, Media & Events



 


Click here for full description of the Equinox Funds’ Social Media Policy. 
 
 

 



PAST PERFORMANCE IS NOT INDICATIVE OF FUTURE RESULTS. THERE IS RISK OF LOSS. YOU CAN LOSE MONEY IN A MANAGED FUTURES PROGRAM.
1For each fund with at least a three-year history, Morningstar calculates a Morningstar Rating™ based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a funds’ monthly performance (including the effects of sales charges, loads, and redemption fees), placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of funds in each category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. (Each share class is counted as a fraction of one fund within this scale and rated separately, which may cause slight variations in the distribution percentages.) The Overall Morningstar Rating for a fund is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and ten-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund was rated against 126 funds in the Managed Futures category (as of 9/30/2016) based on risk-adjusted three-year returns. With respect to the Managed Futures category, the Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund received a Morningstar Rating of five stars for the three-year period ending 9/30/2016. Past performance is no guarantee of future results. 
Morningstar Rating is for the I share class only; other classes may have different performance characteristics.
© 2016 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
2A panel of judges comprised of independent industry professionals, appointed by HFM, determined the winners based on a combination of quantitative and qualitative data.
Investors should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the Funds. This and other important information about the Funds are in the relevant Prospectuses which can be obtained by calling 1.877.837.0600 The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.
Administration: For the Equinox Frontier Funds, BNP Paribas Financial Services, LLC manages NAV administration and Phoenix American Financial Services, Inc. manages Transfer Agency Administration.  Neither BNP Paribas Financial Services, LLC nor Phoenix American Financial Services, Inc. are affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC.  For Equinox Funds, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages all accounting, administration, and compliance matters for the Trust. Gemini Fund Services, LLC is not affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC.  The mutual funds are distributed by Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA/SIPC.
Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC are not affiliated with Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, BNP Paribas Financial Services, LLC, or Phoenix American Financial Services, Inc.
 
5551-NLD-07/26/2017
 



  

 


 








Corporate Home | Equinox Funds
























































Home
Our Firm
Contact



  







StrategiesSingle-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund
Equinox BH-DG Strategy Fund
Equinox Campbell Strategy Fund
Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
Equinox Crabel Strategy Fund
Equinox IPM Systematic Macro Fund
Equinox Systematica Macro Fund

Multi-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund
Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund

Commodity PoolsMulti-StrategyEquinox Frontier Diversified Fund
Equinox Frontier Long/Short Commodity Fund
Equinox Frontier Masters Fund

Multi-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Balanced Fund
Equinox Frontier Heritage Fund
Equinox Frontier Select Fund

Single-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Winton Fund



Performance
Thought LeadershipFeaturedPress Play SeriesManaged Futures and CTAs: A SmorgasbordManaged Futures During Equity "Crises"—An UpdateWhy Managed Futures?The Press Play Series is an Advisor resource to assist when explaining investment related topics to clients.
It is important to understand that not all futures-trading strategies fall under the managed futures umbrella as conventionally defined.
The historical performance of equities and managed futures during times of crisis, including the most recent example, December 2015 – January 2016.
Created as a tool for Advisors, this client friendly presentation provides a succinct overview of the asset class and examines the impact managed futures can have throughout several market environments.

Fund Literature & Forms
News, Media & Events



  







 

 






































































Spotlight


Video Insights

Videos designed to provide investment perspective across
	various topics.



 

Watch the Video 





News, Media & Events


 Media
Jerry Parker, CEO & Founder of Chesapeake Capital, sits down as a guest of The Meb Faber Show to discuss “Turtle Trading,” trend-following, and other topics.
more
 
News
CTA US Performance Awards 2017: The Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund wins 'Best Multi-Manager Fund'
more



 Media
Press Play, a mini-series dedicated to explaining complicated topics in an engaging, succinct, and simplified manner.
more
 
Media
Bloomberg TV and The Hedge Fund Journal feature Aspect Capital
more












PAST PERFORMANCE IS NOT INDICATIVE OF FUTURE RESULTS. THERE IS RISK OF LOSS. YOU CAN LOSE MONEY IN A MANAGED FUTURES PROGRAM.
*For each fund with at least a three-year history, Morningstar calculates a Morningstar Rating™ based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a funds’ monthly performance (including the effects of sales charges, loads, and redemption fees), placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of funds in each category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. (Each share class is counted as a fraction of one fund within this scale and rated separately, which may cause slight variations in the distribution percentages.) The Overall Morningstar Rating for a fund is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and ten-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics.
Morningstar Rating is for the I share class only; other classes may have different performance characteristics.
©2016 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
Investors should carefully consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the Funds. This and other important information about the Funds are in the relevant Prospectuses which can be obtained by calling 1.877.837.0600 The prospectus should be read carefully before investing.
Administration: For the Equinox Frontier Funds, BNP Paribas Financial Services, LLC manages NAV administration and Phoenix American Financial Services, Inc. manages Transfer Agency Administration.  Neither BNP Paribas Financial Services, LLC nor Phoenix American Financial Services, Inc. are affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC or Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP. For the Equinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund, Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund, and the Equinox Alternative Strategy Platform, Gemini Fund Services, LLC manages all accounting, administration, and compliance matters for the Trust. Gemini Fund Services, LLC is not affiliated with Equinox Fund Management, LLC or Equinox Institutional Asset Management LP.The mutual funds are distributed by Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Member FINRA/SIPC.
Equinox Fund Management, LLC, Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP and Equinox Financial Solutions, LLC are not affiliated with Northern Lights Distributors, LLC, Gemini Fund Services, LLC, BNP Paribas Financial Services, LLC, or Phoenix American Financial Services, Inc. 

5550-NLD-07/26/2017  |   5249-NLD-04/10/2017  |  5176-NLD-03/08/2017  |  5437-NLD-06/22/2017  |  5442-NLD-06/26/2017
 



  

 


 








Managed Futures During Equity "Crises"—An Update | Equinox Funds
























































Home
Our Firm
Contact



  







StrategiesSingle-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox Aspect Core Diversified Strategy Fund
Equinox BH-DG Strategy Fund
Equinox Campbell Strategy Fund
Equinox Chesapeake Strategy Fund
Equinox Crabel Strategy Fund
Equinox IPM Systematic Macro Fund
Equinox Systematica Macro Fund

Multi-Strategy Mutual FundsEquinox MutualHedge Futures Strategy Fund
Equinox EquityHedge US Strategy Fund

Commodity PoolsMulti-StrategyEquinox Frontier Diversified Fund
Equinox Frontier Long/Short Commodity Fund
Equinox Frontier Masters Fund

Multi-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Balanced Fund
Equinox Frontier Heritage Fund
Equinox Frontier Select Fund

Single-Strategy (Closed)Equinox Frontier Winton Fund



Performance
Thought LeadershipFeaturedPress Play SeriesManaged Futures and CTAs: A SmorgasbordManaged Futures During Equity "Crises"—An UpdateWhy Managed Futures?The Press Play Series is an Advisor resource to assist when explaining investment related topics to clients.
It is important to understand that not all futures-trading strategies fall under the managed futures umbrella as conventionally defined.
The historical performance of equities and managed futures during times of crisis, including the most recent example, December 2015 – January 2016.
Created as a tool for Advisors, this client friendly presentation provides a succinct overview of the asset class and examines the impact managed futures can have throughout several market environments.

Fund Literature & Forms
News, Media & Events



  







You are hereEquinox Funds/ Managed Futures During Equity "Crises"—An Update 

 








Insights
Managed Futures During Equity "Crises"—An Update










Most individual and institutional portfolios generally have substantial (often 50% or larger) positions in equities and equity-related asset classes. Because the “risk” of these asset classes is generally quite high, the majority of the total risk of these portfolios is driven by equities. Hence, most financial crises, almost by definition, involve large declines in equities, accompanied by similar trends in other markets, as most investors resort to panic selling of risky assets all at the same time. Generally, market volatility also spikes during these times. Many equity market crises are also characterized by a "flight to safety," with increased investments into assets such as the US Dollar, precious metals, and US Treasury securities. These strong price trends and the accompanying volatility expansion can often prove to be an environment in which managed futures have thrived.
The Managed Futures asset class has acquired a reputation among investors for providing what is known as "crisis alpha" – the ability to generate returns at a time of market crisis.1
The latest example of this was the period December 2015 – January 2016, when the S&P 500® Total Return Index lost −6.5%, while the VIX® Index, a forward-looking measure of equity market volatility, spiked by more than 25% (increasing from about 16% at the end of November 2015 to more than 20% at the end of January 2016). The “crisis,” in this instance, has been attributed to Mario Draghi’s underwhelming stimulus measures announced in early December, perhaps exacerbated by the US Fed’s first rate hike, albeit widely anticipated and long overdue, since 2006. Over this period, the Barclay BTOP 50® Index, which is often used as a proxy for the managed futures asset class, gained approximately +1.3%.
Several commentators, including us, have addressed and analyzed this characteristic of managed futures during other past crises. Here, we update those results, using a slightly different and perhaps more “rigorous” definition of a crisis. We look for periods since 1987 when the VIX® Index has either shown an increase of 25% or greater, or has reached an absolute level of at least 30%. We then try to identify the qualitative reason for such an increase, e.g., the events of 9/11/2001, the Greek crisis, etc. Next, we examine the returns on the S&P 500® Total Return Index, equities, and the BTOP 50® Index, managed futures, over those periods.  
Our results are summarized below, and speak for themselves. In every single one of these crises, as we define them, equity markets trade lower, ranging from −6.5% to from −46.4%. Managed futures, by way of contrast, show only three periods with negative returns, ranging from −2.8% to −0.2%, but twelve periods with positive returns, ranging from +1.0% to +18.7%.
 
Historical Performance of Equities and Managed Futures during Crises (%)
1987 - Present




     

PERIOD
startingVIX

endingVIX
 Change inVIX
 EquityRETURNS
 Managed
	FuturesReturns
 Description ofCrisis
 


SEP-NOV
1987

--
-- -- -29% 8.5% Black Monday 


JUL-OCT
1990

21.11
30.04 42.3% -14.1% 13.5% Iraq invades Kuwait 


FEB-MAR
1994

10.63
20.45 92.4% -7.0% 1.0% First Fed hike since 1989 


JUL-AUG
1998

19.71
44.28 124.7% -15.4% 5.4% Russian default and LTCM crisis 


SEP-NOV
2000

16.84
29.65 76.1% -13.1% 6.0% USS Cole; Mad Cow outbreak; Bush v Gore 


FEB-MAR
2001

22.02
28.64 30.1% -14.9% 5.3% Bush inaugurated; US and Britain attack Iraq 


JUL-SEP
2001

19.06
31.93 67.5% -14.7% 4.1% Events leading up to 9/11 attacks 


APR-SEP
2002

17.40
39.69 127.1% -28.4% 18.7% Enron and WorldCom; End of tech bubble 


DEC-FEB
02'-03

27.50
29.63 7.7% -9.7% 17.5% War in Iraq; SARS outbreak 


JUN-FEB
'08-09

17.83
46.35 160.0% -46.4% 7.2% Global financial crisis (The Great Recession) 


MAY-JUN
2010

22.05
34.54 56.6% -12.8% -2.8% Greek crisis 


MAY-SEP
2011

14.75
42.96 191.3% -16.3% -2.1% Eurozone debt crisis; US credit downgrade 


APR-MAY
2012

15.50
24.06 55.2% -6.6% 2.2% Continuing European crises 


AUG-SEP
2015

12.12
24.50 102.1% -8.4% -0.2% Chinese currency crisis 


DEC-JAN
'15-16

16.13
20.20 25.2% -6.5% 1.3% Draghi stimulus fiasco; first Fed hike since 2006 


 
It is worth exploring possible explanations for these historical results. These are summarized succinctly in the paper by Kaminski, cited earlier, as follows:
Managed futures strategies tend to be highly liquid and trade almost exclusively in futures markets with minimal credit exposure; hence, they may be less susceptible to the illiquidity and credit traps that are generally prevalent during equity market crisis.
		 
They are dominated by systematic trading strategies, with no long equity bias; hence, they tend to be less susceptible to behavioral biases and the emotion-based or panic-driven selling that is often triggered when large losses are experienced.
		 
They trade across a wide range of sectors and markets, and can hold either long or short exposures, depending on perceived price trends; hence, they have the potential to profit from both up-trends and down-trends across multiple global futures markets.
Our evidence is based purely on historical data, and there is no assurance that these patterns will necessarily repeat during future crises. Further, managed futures as an asset class tend to have low correlations to most other asset classes, which means they have the potential to provide diversification benefits by lowering the overall risk of a portfolio. However, they should not be viewed as “hedges,” because a hedge is traditionally defined as an asset that has a high negative correlation.
 
 
FOOTNOTES
Please refer to the glossary for definitions of terms and indices.
 

 
 


 













Dr. Ajay  Dravid


Chief Investment Officer, Equinox Institutional Asset Management, LP
Managing Director of Portfolio Strategy, Equinox Fund Management, LLC
 

"Our results are summarized below, and speak for themselves. In every single one of these crises, as we define them, equity markets trade lower."
 
 





FOOTNOTES
1See, for example: In Search of Crisis Alpha: A Short Guide to Investing in Managed Futures, Kathryn M. Kaminski (CME Group).
Please refer to the glossary for definitions of terms and indices.
 
 




VIEW PDF



TO ORDER, EMAIL USinfo@equinoxfunds.com 
 

 



PAST PERFORMANCE DATA QUOTED HERE REPRESENTS PAST PERFORMANCE. CURRENT PERFORMANCE MAY BE LOWER OR HIGHER THAN THE PERFROMANCE QUOTED ABOVE. PAST PERFORMANCE DOES NOT GUARANTEE FUTURE RESULTS.
Diversification does not ensure profit or prevent losses. An investment in Managed Futures is speculative and involves a high degree of risk. You can lose money in a Managed Futures Program. There is no guarantee that an investment in Managed Futures will achieve its objectives, goals, generate positive returns, or avoid losses.
A Word About Risk
	The purchase of a managed futures investment involves a high degree of risk. Specifically, you should be aware that, in addition to normal investment risks, managed futures investments entail certain risks, including, in all or some cases:
• Managed futures often engage in leveraging and other speculative investment practices that may increase the risk of investment loss.
	• Managed futures can be highly illiquid.
	• Managed futures are not required to provide periodic pricing or valuation information to investors.
	• Managed futures may involve complex tax structures and delays in distributing important tax information.
	• Managed futures are not subject to the same regulatory requirements as mutual funds.
	• Managed futures often charge high fees
THE MATERIAL PROVIDED HEREIN HAS BEEN PROVIDED BY EQUINOX FUND MANAGEMENT, LLC AND IS FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY.  EQUINOX FUND MANAGEMENT, LLC IS THE ADVISOR TO ONE OR MORE MUTUAL FUNDS DISTRIBUTED BY NORTHERN LIGHTS DISTRIBUTORS, LLC MEMBER FINRA/SIPC.
Securities offered through Equinox Group Distributors, LLC, Member of FINRA. To obtain more information, contact Equinox Funds at 1.877.837.0600 or info@equinoxfunds.com.
5134-NLD-02/18/2016
	 
 



  

 




	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































